Missouri, session 2026, SB1296.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.782, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.782,
to read as follows:
143.782. As used in sections 143.782 to 143.788,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
terms shall mean and include:
(1) "Court", the supreme court, court of appeals, or
any circuit court of the state;
(2) "Debt", any sum due and legally owed to any state
agency which has accrued through contract, subrogation,
tort, or operation of law regardless of whether there is an
outstanding judgment for that sum, court costs as defined in
section 488.010, fines and fees owed, or any support
obligation which is being enforced by the family support
division on behalf of a person who is receiving support
enforcement services pursuant to section 454.425, or any
claim for unpaid health care services which is being
enforced by the department of health and senior services on
behalf of a hospital or health care provider under section
143.790;

SB 1296 2
(3) "Debtor", any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation or other legal entity owing a debt;
(4) "Department", the department of revenue of the
state of Missouri;
(5) "Refund", the Missouri income tax refund which the
department determines to be due any taxpayer pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter. The amount of a refund shall
not include any senior citizens property tax credit provided
by sections 135.010 to 135.035 unless such refund is being
offset for a delinquency or debt relating to individual
income tax or a property tax credit; and
(6) "State agency", any department, division, board,
commission, office, or other agency of the state of
Missouri, including public community college districts and
housing authorities as defined in section 99.020. The term
"state agency" shall also include municipalities with
populations over two hundred fifty thousand, for eligible
debts arising on or after January 1, 2027.
✓